North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159G. Water Infrastructure.
Article 5. State Water Infrastructure Authority.

§ 159G-70.
State Water Infrastructure Authority created.

Authority Established. — The State Water Infrastructure Authority is created within the Department of Environmental Quality.

Membership. — The Authority consists of nine members as follows:

The Director of the Division of Water Infrastructure of the Department or the Director’s designee who is familiar with the water infrastructure financing, regulatory, and technical assistance programs of the Department.

The Secretary of Commerce or the Secretary’s designee who is familiar with the State programs that fund water or other infrastructure improvements for the purpose of promoting economic development.

The Director of the Local Government Commission or the Director’s designee who is familiar with the functions of the Commission.

One member who is a professional engineer in the private sector and is familiar with the development of infrastructure necessary for wastewater systems, to be appointed by the Governor to a term that expires on July 1 of even-numbered years.

One member who is knowledgeable about, and has experience related to, direct federal funding programs for wastewater and public water systems, to be appointed by the Governor to a term that expires on July 1 of odd-numbered years.

One member who is knowledgeable about, and has experience related to, urban local government wastewater systems or public water systems, to be appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate to a term that expires on July 1 of even-numbered years.

One member who is knowledgeable about, and has experience related to, rural local government wastewater systems or public water systems, to be appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate to a term that expires on July 1 of odd-numbered years.

One member who either (i) is a county commissioner of a rural county or (ii) resides in a rural county and is knowledgeable about, and has experience related to, public health services, to be appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives to a term that expires on July 1 of even-numbered years.

One member who is familiar with wastewater, drinking water, and stormwater issues and related State funding sources, to be appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives to a term that expires on July 1 of odd-numbered years.

Terms. — The members appointed by the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall serve two-year terms. The other members, who are ex officio members or designees of those members, shall serve until they are no longer in office or are replaced with another designee.

Chair. — The Director of the Division of Water Infrastructure, or the Director’s designee, shall serve as Chair of the Authority. The Chair must call the first meeting. The Chair shall serve as a nonvoting member, provided, however, that the Chair shall vote to break a tie.

Meetings. — The Authority shall meet at least four times a year and may meet as often as needed. A majority of the members of the Authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting of the Authority is required for action to be taken by the Authority.

Vacancies. — A vacancy in the Authority or as Chair of the Authority resulting from the resignation of a member or otherwise is filled in the same manner in which the original appointment was made. The term of an appointment to fill a vacancy is for the balance of the unexpired term.

Compensation. — Each member of the Authority shall receive no salary as a result of serving on the Authority but shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel expenses in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 120-3.1

, 138-5, and 138-6, as applicable.

History.

2013-360, s. 14.21(b); 2013-363, s. 5.12; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(a), provides: “The Division of Water Infrastructure is established as a new division within the environmental area of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources [now Department of Environmental Quality]. All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Division of Water Quality of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources pertaining to the implementation and administration of Chapter 159G of the General Statutes are transferred to and vested in the Division of Water Infrastructure by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

. All functions, powers, duties, and obligations previously vested in the Division of Water Resources of the Department of Environment and Natural Resources pertaining to the implementation and administration of Chapter 159G of the General Statutes are transferred to and vested in the Division of Water Infrastructure by a Type II transfer, as defined in

G.S. 143A-6

. The Water Infrastructure Fund established under

G.S. 159G-22

and all accounts within the Water Infrastructure Fund under

G.S. 159G-22

shall be transferred to and administered by the Division of Water Infrastructure. In addition to its other duties set forth in Chapter 159G, the Division of Water Infrastructure shall be responsible for administering the program whereby local government units are awarded funds by the State Water Infrastructure Authority created by this section for infrastructure projects from community development block grant funds.”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2015.’ ”

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 33.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-363, s. 5.12, effective July 1, 2013, in subdivisions (b)(6) and (b)(7), substituted “knowledgeable about, and has experience related to” for “a representative of an” and for “a representative of a” and substituted “systems” for “system” twice.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (a).

§ 159G-71.
State Water Infrastructure Authority; powers and duties.

The Authority has the following additional duties:

After reviewing the recommendations for grants and loans submitted to it by the Division, to determine the rank of applications and to select the applications that are eligible to receive grants and loans, consistent with federal law.

To establish priorities for making loans and grants under this Chapter, consistent with federal law.

To review the criteria for making loans and grants under

G.S. 159G-23

and make recommendations, if any, to the Department for additional criteria or changes to the criteria, consistent with federal law.

To develop guidelines for making loans and grants under this Chapter, consistent with federal law.

To develop a master plan to meet the State’s water infrastructure needs.

To assess and make recommendations on the role of the State in the development and funding of wastewater, drinking water, and stormwater infrastructure in the State.

To analyze the adequacy of projected funding to meet projected needs over the next five years.

To make recommendations on ways to maximize the use of current funding resources, whether federal, State, or local, and to ensure that funds are used in a coordinated manner.

To review the application of management practices in wastewater, drinking water, and stormwater utilities and to determine the best practices.

To assess the role of public-private partnerships in the future provision of utility service.

To assess the application of the river basin approach to utility planning and management.

To assess the need for a “troubled system” protocol.

History.

2013-360, s. 14.21(b).

§ 159G-72.
State Water Infrastructure Authority; reports.

No later than November 1 of each year, the Authority shall submit a report of its activity and findings, including any recommendations or legislative proposals, to the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division with the report required by G.S. 159G-26(a) as a single report.

History.

2013-360, s. 14.21(b); 2017-10, s. 4.17(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-10, s. 4.17(b), effective May 4, 2017, substituted “Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division with the report required by G.S. 159G-26(a) as a single report” for “Senate Appropriations Committee on Natural and Economic Resources, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Natural and Economic Resources, and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Commission” at the end of the sentence.